Hawaii statutes.
[§386-21.5] Publication of fees by prepaid
health care plan contractors. (a) A prepaid health care plan contractor
as defined in section 393-3 shall provide the director upon request with a
schedule of all the maximum allowable medical fees.

(b) Pursuant to section 386-21(c), the
director shall review and, to the extent possible, shall use the fee obtained
under subsection (a) as the primary guideline in establishing prevalent charges
for medical care, services, and supplies in adopting the fee schedule for
workers' compensation claims. [L 1995, c 234, §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next